Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 1 Medical Assistance Act
71-5-137. Disclosures required of persons associated with managed care organizations.

The following persons associated with a managed care organization that participates in the TennCare program shall make disclosures required in § 8-50-502:

Officers and directors of the managed care organization;

Any person who is the legal or beneficial owner of five percent (5%) or more of the stock or other ownership interest in the managed care organization; and

Any person who controls, is controlled by or is under common control with, the managed care organization and who has entered into a management agreement, service contract, cost-sharing agreement or reinsurance contract with a managed care organization. For purposes of this subdivision (a)(3), “control” has the same meaning as set forth in § 56-11-101(b).

An official in the legislative branch, or an official in the executive branch and their immediate families, as such terms are defined in § 3-6-301, shall disclose any ownership interest or other connection as an officer, employee or director that such person may have in any managed care organization that participates in the TennCare program.

The compensation from the managed care organization of all persons required to make disclosure under subsection (a) shall be disclosed in addition to the disclosure required under subsection (a).

Disclosures required by this section shall be made to the bureau of TennCare and shall be made by March 1 of each year for the previous calendar year.

Acts 1999, ch. 379, § 1; 2013, ch. 89, § 4.

71-5-138. Compliance with provisions regarding authorizations for pharmacy services.

Any managed care organization participating in the TennCare program shall comply with the provisions of §56-32-138 concerning authorizations given to a pharmacy services provider for care to be delivered to an enrollee receiving TennCare benefits.

Acts 2001, ch. 340, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2001, ch. 340, § 4, provided that the act shall not apply to health plans preempted from state regulation by the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 (“ERISA”) (P.L. 93-406, which is compiled in 29 U.S.C. § 1001 et seq.).

71-5-139. Protection of TennCare patients' federal and court ordered rights by health care providers receiving TennCare funds.

In order to protect TennCare patients and ensure the state's compliance with applicable federal regulations or court order, managed care organizations, behavioral health organizations and certain health care providers that receive TennCare funds shall comply with the following requirements:

Whenever a TennCare enrollee is entitled under applicable federal regulations or court order to notice and an opportunity to appeal a provider initiated reduction, termination or suspension of inpatient hospital care, where the service being provided to the enrollee is to treat an enrollee's chronic condition across a continuum of services when the next appropriate level of medical service is not immediately available, it shall be the duty of the hospital where the patient is receiving care to timely notify the patient's managed care organization of that fact. The hospital shall also have a duty to cooperate with the managed care organization in the provision to the patient of timely notice of the patient's rights under such applicable federal regulations or court order. In the event that a TennCare enrollee continues to receive inpatient care, as authorized by such applicable federal regulations or court order, because the next level of care prescribed for the patient is not immediately available, the managed care organization shall reimburse the hospital for such additional care. Nothing in this subdivision (a)(1) relieves the managed care organization of its ultimate responsibility for ensuring compliance with applicable federal regulations or court order, with respect to the provision of notice and services to the patient;

Whenever a TennCare enrollee is entitled under applicable federal regulations or court order to notice and an opportunity to appeal a provider initiated reduction, termination or suspension of home health services, it shall be the duty of the home care organization that has been caring for the patient to timely notify the patient's managed care organization of the proposed change. The home care organization shall cooperate with the managed care organization in the provision to the patient of timely notice of the patient's rights under such applicable federal regulations or court order. In the event that a TennCare enrollee continues to receive home health services, as authorized by such applicable federal regulations or court order, the managed care organization shall reimburse the home care organization for such additional services. Nothing in this subdivision (a)(2) relieves the managed care organization of its ultimate responsibility for ensuring compliance with applicable federal regulations or court order, with respect to the provision of notice and services to the patient;

Whenever a TennCare enrollee is entitled under applicable federal regulations or court order to notice and an opportunity to appeal a provider initiated reduction, termination or suspension of inpatient psychiatric or residential service, it shall be the duty of the facility where the patient is receiving care to timely notify the patient's behavioral health organization of the proposed change. The facility shall also have a duty to cooperate with the behavioral health organization in the provision to the patient of timely notice of the patient's rights under such applicable federal regulations or court order. In the event that a TennCare enrollee continues to receive inpatient or residential care, as authorized by such applicable federal regulations or court order, the behavioral health organization shall reimburse the facility for such additional care. Nothing in this subdivision (a)(3) relieves the behavioral health organization of its ultimate responsibility for ensuring compliance with applicable federal regulations or court order, with respect to the provision of notice and services to the patient; and

Whenever a TennCare enrollee who is classified as severely and persistently mentally ill, or severely emotionally disturbed, is entitled under applicable federal regulations or court order to notice and an opportunity to appeal a provider initiated reduction, termination or suspension of behavioral health service, it shall be the duty of the health care provider who is caring for the patient to timely notify the patient's behavioral health organization of the proposed change. The provider shall also have a duty to cooperate with the behavioral health organization in the provision to the patient of timely notice of the patient's rights under such applicable federal regulations or court order. In the event that a TennCare enrollee continues to receive such behavioral health service, as authorized by such applicable federal regulations or court order, the behavioral health organization shall reimburse the provider for that additional care. Nothing in this subdivision (a)(4) relieves the behavioral health organization of its ultimate responsibility for ensuring compliance with applicable federal regulations or court order, with respect to the provision of notice and services to the patient.

The commissioner of finance and administration is authorized to promulgate emergency rules pursuant to § 4-5-208 as necessary to implement this section.

Acts 2001, ch. 346, § 1; 2009, ch. 566, § 12.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 566, § 12 provided that the Tennessee code commission is directed to change all references to public necessity rules, wherever such references appear in this code, to emergency rules, as sections are amended and volumes are replaced.

71-5-140. Deductions for dental services paid by eligible individuals in long-term care facilities.

In addition to the deductions from the total income available for the cost of long-term nursing home care authorized pursuant to the rules and regulations of the department of human services, division of medical services, for an eligible individual confined to a long-term care facility, a deduction shall also be authorized and made from such total income available for the costs for dental services paid by the eligible individual.

Deductions for such dental services shall be made for those services whether such services are provided at a dental office, on-site at the long-term care facility, or through a mobile dental services provider that contracts with the long-term care facility.

A mobile dental services provider providing such dental services shall meet and comply with the following requirements:

The requirements of § 63-5-121;

The mobile dental services provider shall obtain a consent for dental services either from the resident or from the resident's responsible party, which consent shall remain valid and in force for the entire length of stay of the resident unless otherwise revoked by the resident or the responsible party;

The mobile dental services provider shall contract with dentists licensed in this state who have a medicare/medicaid number;

The mobile dental services provider may provide routine and emergency dental services as consented to under subdivision (c)(2) or subsection (e). Services related to the provision of dentures shall be deemed medically necessary, in writing, by the facility's medical director or the patient's attending physician prior to the delivery of such services. The facility shall not be directly liable to the provider for dental services; and

The mobile dental services provider shall maintain records of services provided on standard American Dental Association (ADA) claim forms using appropriate CDT-3 codes for services delivered. Records shall be maintained by the provider of services for five (5) years following the date of service. Records maintained by the mobile dental services provider shall be subject to audit by TennCare, comptroller of the treasury's office or any government regulatory agency at least annually.

Upon the submission of a request by the dental services provider for a deduction under this section to the respective county office of the department of human services, the department staff shall process the request within thirty (30) days of receipt. Such office shall report the approval or disapproval of such deduction directly to the long-term care facility, and the responsible party, if any.

If the responsible party has not signed or refuses to sign the consent required pursuant to subdivision (c)(2), nor notifies the long-term care facility of an arrangement for alternative dental care, the long-term care facility may choose to authorize the provision of dental services on behalf of the resident for the immediate dental care required. However, under no circumstances shall such an authorization for consent to treatment make the facility liable for payment for services beyond those funds received by the facility from the patient's responsible party, if any.

If the facility is the representative payee for the resident's social security income, the dental services provider shall not be required to bill the responsible party, but may be paid from the resident's financial resources received by the long-term care facility. The long-term care facility shall pay the dental services provider within thirty (30) days of receipt of such funds, to the extent such payment is authorized as a deduction by the department of human services.

If the facility is not the representative payee for the resident's social security income, the dental services provider shall bill the responsible party unless the facility agrees to pay the dental services provider from the resident's financial resources received by the facility. The dental services provider shall have the right to bill the responsible party for the authorized deduction in the event such funds are not forwarded to the facility by the responsible party. However, the facility, under either subsection (f) or this subsection (g), shall not be directly liable to the provider for dental services.

Acts 2002, ch. 717, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. The CDT-3, referred to in this section, is the American Dental Association's official source for dental procedure codes.

71-5-141. Eligibility of aliens for medical assistance.

Aliens shall be eligible for medical assistance, including participation in the TennCare program, only to the same extent as permitted under federal law and regulations for receipt of federal financial participation under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, except as otherwise provided in this section.

In accordance with Section 1903(v)(1) of the federal Social Security Act, an alien shall only be eligible for the full scope of medical assistance benefits, if the alien has been lawfully admitted for permanent residence, or is otherwise permanently residing in the United States under color of law.

For purposes of this section, aliens “permanently residing in the United States under color of law” shall be interpreted to include all aliens residing in the United States with the knowledge and permission of the United States immigration and naturalization service and whose departure the United States immigration and naturalization service does not contemplate enforcing and with respect to whom federal financial participation is available under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act.

Acts 2002, ch. 880, § 17.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2002, ch. 880, § 1 provided that the act is, and may be cited as, “The TennCare Reform Act of 2002”.

Acts 2002, ch. 880, § 5 provided that any costs associated with the implementation of that act, except as to the costs of the medicaid fraud control unit of the Tennessee bureau of investigation, shall be paid from existing funds appropriated to the TennCare program.

Acts 2002, ch. 880, § 8 provided that:

“(a) The fiscal review committee, in consultation with the bureau of TennCare and the select oversight committee on TennCare (repealed), shall study the feasibility of outsourcing eligibility determinations and reverifications for the TennCare expansion population, including requesting information from potential contractors. It is the legislative intent that information from interested potential contractors be received by October 15, 2002.

“(b) The fiscal review committee, in consultation with the bureau of TennCare and the select oversight committee on TennCare (repealed), shall evaluate the responses from potential contractors and shall, no later than January 1, 2003, report its findings to the general assembly, the commissioner of finance and administration, the comptroller of the treasury and the governor, relative to whether eligibility and re-verification services should be contracted and procured through competitive proposals.”

Acts 2002, ch. 880, § 20 provided that the provisions of that act shall only apply so long as the state operates the TennCare program as a statewide waiver with an expansion population of uninsureds and uninsurables under Section 1115 of the federal Social Security Act [42 U.S.C. § 1315]. If at any time the state ceases to operate under such a waiver, then the provisions of the act shall not be applied and enforcement of such provisions shall be terminated.

71-5-142. Confidentiality and disclosure of proprietary information.

All proprietary information, including but not limited to, provider reimbursement information provided either to the Tennessee department of commerce and insurance or to the TennCare bureau, or any successor entity operated by the state of Tennessee for the purpose of administering the TennCare program, or any successor program shall be deemed confidential and not subject to disclosure under the Tennessee Public Records Act, compiled in title 10, chapter 7. Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to conflict with or obviate §§ 56-9-202(b) and 56-9-504(f).

This section shall not apply to disclosures to the medicaid fraud unit of the Tennessee bureau of investigation for law enforcement activities authorized by federal or state law.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit access to, or use of, these records by governmental agencies performing official functions.

Acts 2002, ch. 880, § 18.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2002, ch. 880, § 1 provided that the act is, and may be cited as, “The TennCare Reform Act of 2002”.

Acts 2002, ch. 880, § 5 provided that any costs associated with the implementation of that act, except as to the costs of the medicaid fraud control unit of the Tennessee bureau of investigation, shall be paid from existing funds appropriated to the TennCare program.

Acts 2002, ch. 880, § 8 provided that:

“(a) The fiscal review committee, in consultation with the bureau of TennCare and the select oversight committee on TennCare (repealed), shall study the feasibility of outsourcing eligibility determinations and reverifications for the TennCare expansion population, including requesting information from potential contractors. It is the legislative intent that information from interested potential contractors be received by October 15, 2002.

“(b) The fiscal review committee, in consultation with the bureau of TennCare and the select oversight committee on TennCare (repealed), shall evaluate the responses from potential contractors and shall, no later than January 1, 2003, report its findings to the general assembly, the commissioner of finance and administration, the comptroller of the treasury and the governor, relative to whether eligibility and re-verification services should be contracted and procured through competitive proposals.”

Acts 2002, ch. 880, § 20 provided that the provisions of that act shall only apply so long as the state operates the TennCare program as a statewide waiver with an expansion population of uninsureds and uninsurables under Section 1115 of the federal Social Security Act [42 U.S.C. § 1315]. If at any time the state ceases to operate under such a waiver, then the provisions of the act shall not be applied and enforcement of such provisions shall be terminated.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

71-5-143. TennCare advisory commission — Composition — Purpose — Expert assistance — Confidentiality — Conflict — Compensation.

There is established in the department of finance and administration a TennCare advisory commission. The advisory commission will be separate and distinct from the bureau of TennCare but will be allowed access to all data concerning the operations, management, and program functions of the TennCare program, including information relevant to the TennCare program held or maintained by other state agencies. In accordance with 45 CFR 160.101 et seq., members of the advisory commission will provide nonpaid consulting services to the bureau of TennCare and may have access to protected health information to the extent necessary to perform their advisory function.

The advisory commission shall be appointed by the governor and will be composed of thirteen (13) members who should reflect the broad impact that the TennCare program has on this state. The membership of the advisory commission shall include one (1) representative of the advocacy community; the chair of the health committee of the house of representatives, or the chair's designee; the chair of the health and welfare committee of the senate, or the chair's designee; two (2) representatives from the Tennessee business community; and three (3) representatives from the provider community. In addition, the membership of the advisory commission shall include one (1) person chosen by the governor from a list of three (3) persons nominated by the speaker of the house of representatives, and one (1) person chosen by the governor from a list of three (3) persons nominated by the speaker of the senate. If the governor does not choose a commissioner member from the initial list of three (3) persons nominated by each speaker, the appropriate speaker shall submit another list of three (3) persons for the governor's consideration. In making the appointments, the governor shall strive to ensure that the advisory commission's membership is representative of the state's geographic and demographic composition with appropriate attention to the representation of women and minorities. In making the initial appointments, the governor will designate three (3) initial appointees to serve until December 31, 2005, four (4) initial appointees to serve until December 31, 2006, and four (4) initial appointees to serve until December 31, 2007. Except for initial appointments, members shall be appointed to three-year terms. At the time of the initial appointments of the advisory commission, the governor shall appoint a chair and vice-chair of the commission from the membership of the commission who shall serve until December 31, 2005. The governor shall thereafter appoint a chair and vice-chair to one-year terms from the membership of the commission.

The purpose of the commission is to review annually the health care operations including, but not limited to, cost-management analysis, benefits, enrollment, eligibility, costs, and performance of the TennCare program and to make recommendations to the governor regarding cost-containment strategies and cost-effective program improvements. Such recommendations by the commission will include an assessment of the effectiveness of the existing TennCare program, specific steps that could be taken to reduce program costs, and an evaluation of whether the program is optimizing its use of resources to best meet the needs of TennCare enrollees. Proposed modifications submitted by the commission that may result in increased program expenditures should be accompanied by recommendations to achieve commensurate savings in other program areas in order to achieve overall management of program costs. The commission shall present its recommendations in writing to the governor no later than November 10 of each year.

Subject to an appropriation set forth in the general appropriations act, the commission will have the power to engage expert assistance in accordance with the state procurement processes. The department of finance and administration will provide the commission with appropriate staff and assistance.

Members of the advisory commission shall maintain strict standards of confidentiality in the handling of all matters before the commission in accordance with federal and state law. All material and information, regardless of form, medium, or method of communication, provided to or acquired by a member or the commission staff in the course of the commission's work, shall be regarded as confidential information and shall not be disclosed and are deemed not to be a public record. In addition, all material and information, regardless of form, medium, or method of communication, made or generated by a member or the commission staff in the course of the commission's work, shall be regarded as confidential information and shall not be disclosed and are not public records. All necessary steps shall be taken by members and staff to safeguard the confidentiality of such material or information in conformance with federal and state law.

Items or matters discussed by the commission may from time to time present real or apparent conflicts for members of the commission. Due to the importance of the commission's work and the advisory nature of its recommendations, in the event that a matter being considered by the commission presents a real or apparent conflict of interest, the affected member of the commission shall disclose the conflict to the chair but shall be allowed to discuss and take official action on the particular matter. The professional backgrounds of each member of the advisory commission as well as any conflicts disclosed by a member to the chair during a given year shall be reported in the commission's recommendations as set forth in subsection (c) of this section.

Members shall receive no compensation for their services on the commission but may be reimbursed for those expenses allowed by the comprehensive travel regulations promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

Acts 2004, ch. 673, § 3; 2016, ch. 1079, §§ 5, 6.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 673, § 29 provided that to effectuate the provisions of the act, the commissioner of finance and administration shall have the authority to promulgate any necessary rules and regulations not otherwise provided for in this act. All rules and regulations provided for in this act are authorized to be promulgated as public necessity rules (now emergency rules) pursuant to §4-5-209 (now §4-5-208). All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2016, ch. 1079, § 1 provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as the “TennCare Omnibus Act of 2016”.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

71-5-144. Medically necessary items and services.

Enrollees under the TennCare program are eligible to receive, and TennCare shall provide payment for, only those medical items and services that are:

Within the scope of defined benefits for which the enrollee is eligible under the TennCare program; and

Determined by the TennCare program to be medically necessary.

To be determined to be medically necessary, a medical item or service must be recommended by a physician who is treating the enrollee or other licensed healthcare provider practicing within the scope of the physician's license who is treating the enrollee and must satisfy each of the following criteria:

It must be required in order to diagnose or treat an enrollee's medical condition. The convenience of an enrollee, the enrollee's family, or a provider, shall not be a factor or justification in determining that a medical item or service is medically necessary;

It must be safe and effective. To qualify as safe and effective, the type and level of medical item or service must be consistent with the symptoms or diagnosis and treatment of the particular medical condition, and the reasonably anticipated medical benefits of the item or service must outweigh the reasonably anticipated medical risks based on the enrollee's condition and scientifically supported evidence;

It must be the least costly alternative course of diagnosis or treatment that is adequate for the medical condition of the enrollee. When applied to medical items or services delivered in an inpatient setting, it further means that the medical item or service cannot be safely provided for the same or lesser cost to the person in an outpatient setting. Where there are less costly alternative courses of diagnosis or treatment, including less costly alternative settings, that are adequate for the medical condition of the enrollee, more costly alternative courses of diagnosis or treatment are not medically necessary. An alternative course of diagnosis or treatment may include observation, lifestyle or behavioral changes or, where appropriate, no treatment at all; and

It must not be experimental or investigational. A medical item or service is experimental or investigational if there is inadequate empirically-based objective clinical scientific evidence of its safety and effectiveness for the particular use in question. This standard is not satisfied by a provider's subjective clinical judgment on the safety and effectiveness of a medical item or service or by a reasonable medical or clinical hypothesis based on an extrapolation from use in another setting or from use in diagnosing or treating another condition;

Use of a drug or biological product that has not been approved under a new drug application for marketing by the United States Food and Drug Administration (FDA) is deemed experimental;

Use of a drug or biological product that has been approved for marketing by the FDA but is proposed to be used for other than the FDA-approved purpose will not be deemed medically necessary unless the use can be shown to be widespread, to be generally accepted by the professional medical community as an effective and proven treatment in the setting and for the condition for which it is used, and to satisfy the requirements of subdivisions (b)(1)-(3).

It is the responsibility of the bureau of TennCare ultimately to determine what medical items and services are medically necessary for the TennCare program. The fact that a provider has prescribed, recommended or approved a medical item or service does not, in itself, make such item or service medically necessary.

The medical necessity standard set forth in this section shall govern the delivery of all services and items to all enrollees or classes of beneficiaries in the TennCare program. The bureau of TennCare is authorized to make limited special provisions for particular items or services, such as long-term care, or such as may be required for compliance with federal law.

Medical protocols developed using evidence-based medicine that are authorized by the bureau of TennCare pursuant to § 71-5-107 shall satisfy the standard of medical necessity. Such protocols shall be appropriately published to all TennCare providers and managed care organizations.

The bureau of TennCare is authorized to promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary to implement this section.

Acts 2004, ch. 673, § 22.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 673, § 29 provided that to effectuate the provisions of the act, the commissioner of finance and administration shall have the authority to promulgate any necessary rules and regulations not otherwise provided for in this act. All rules and regulations provided for in this act are authorized to be promulgated as public necessity rules (now emergency rules) pursuant to §4-5-209 (now §4-5-208). All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

71-5-145. Cost effectiveness of providers.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, any initiative, program or measure operated by the bureau of TennCare, including, but not limited to, disease management programs, may require enrollees to obtain prescription drugs, durable medical equipment, or medical supplies in such manner as the bureau of TennCare determines to be the most cost-effective.

The bureau of TennCare shall consult with Tennessee pharmacists who are providers actively participating in the TennCare pharmacy program in making a determination of cost effectiveness of any proposed pharmacy program.

Acts 2004, ch. 673, § 23.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 673, § 29 provided that to effectuate the provisions of the act, the commissioner of finance and administration shall have the authority to promulgate any necessary rules and regulations not otherwise provided for in this act. All rules and regulations provided for in this act are authorized to be promulgated as public necessity rules (now emergency rules) pursuant to §4-5-209 (now §4-5-208). All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

71-5-146. Pharmacy lock-in program.

On and after July 1, 2004, the bureau of TennCare, through its authority to promulgate rules and regulations, may implement and maintain a pharmacy lock-in program designed to address member abuse, over utilization and quality of care concerns for TennCare enrollees.

Acts 2004, ch. 673, § 28.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 673, § 29 provided that to effectuate the provisions of the act, the commissioner of finance and administration shall have the authority to promulgate any necessary rules and regulations not otherwise provided for in this act. All rules and regulations provided for in this act are authorized to be promulgated as public necessity rules (now emergency rules) pursuant to §4-5-209 (now §4-5-208). All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

71-5-147. Personal needs allowance — Protecting nursing home residents from diversion of allowance.

In determining the amount of an eligible individual's income available for the cost of long-term nursing home care authorized under this part on or after January 1, 2010, a deduction shall be made from the person's total income in the amount of fifty dollars ($50.00) per month to be treated as a personal needs allowance within the meaning of applicable federal regulations.

The department of health is directed to review, and revise as necessary, recommendations previously developed to protect nursing home residents from vendors and others who would seek to provide inappropriate or unneeded goods and services, or otherwise divert personal needs allowance funds for uses other than those meeting residents' personal needs.

The recommendations shall be provided to the general welfare, health and human resources committee of the senate and to the health and human resources committee of the house of representatives not later than the second Tuesday in January, 2010.

Acts 2004, ch. 851, §§ 1, 2; 2009, ch. 592, § 1.

71-5-148. Health care safety net for uninsured.

To the extent that funds are specifically appropriated by the general appropriations act, including, but not limited to, any such funds that may be available from the bureau of TennCare's reserve funds, the department of finance and administration, in coordination with the department of health and the department of mental health and substance abuse services, is authorized to facilitate the expansion and augmentation of a health care safety net in this state. The health care safety net provides medical assistance and dental assistance to individuals in need of medical care and dental care to adults in need of adult emergency dental services who are uninsured and who lack financial resources to secure medical and dental care. It is the legislative intent that priority should be given to efforts pursuant to this section that benefit the greatest number of such individuals. Such efforts may include, but not be limited to:

Improvement and expansion of the provision of medical assistance, both medical services and pharmacy, in the county health departments, with specific emphasis placed in providing assistance in those counties with the largest number of uninsured individuals; such support could include funding for additional staffing needs and facility expansion;

Support for community-based health care facilities and practices, including not-for-profit clinics, faith-based facilities, community mental health agencies, and federally qualified health centers, for the provision of health care services to the uninsured;

Incentive-based measures to encourage and promote physician involvement and treatment of the uninsured population, including specific steps taken to assist in providing for continuity of care, including specialty care, for such individuals, as well as targeted efforts at comprehensive disease management;

Creation and implementation of a twenty-four-hour, seven-day a week health care safety net hotline designed to assist and direct individuals in need of medical care and services to available resources in their areas;

Creation of a donated care referral system that can be easily accessed by individuals in need of medical care;

Collaborative work with agencies and entities across the state to encourage citizens to volunteer their time, effort, and resources in creative efforts to assist in the overall care and well-being of uninsured individuals in this state; and

Support for community-based providers of behavioral health services to seriously and persistently mentally ill adults who are uninsured and who lack financial resources to secure behavioral health care.

Nothing established or supported pursuant to this section shall in any way be construed or determined to be an entitlement by any individual or entity to any medical assistance, medical services, or any pharmacy services, or, if such assistance or services are provided, to any continuing assistance or services by the state or by any other entity or person.

Acts 2005, ch. 474, § 1; 2008, ch. 1064, § 2; 2009, ch. 95, § 2; 2010, ch. 1100, § 140; 2012, ch. 575, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act regarding the behavioral health safety net of Tennessee, please refer to Acts 2009, ch. 95.

Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

71-5-149. Disease management program.

The bureau of TennCare shall adopt a state disease management program, which may include contracting with a vendor that specializes in the provision of disease management services. The disease management program shall be designed to improve care to and reduce overall expenditures for TennCare beneficiaries with chronic illnesses. The disease management program may include the development of evidence-based medical practice guidelines, support services to assist physicians in monitoring their patients, more closely managed patient care, including management of the proper use of prescription drugs by patients, and the development of individual patient treatment plans that may include recommendations for improved medication compliance and improved lifestyle and behavioral compliance. The adoption of a disease management program is not an agency action and does not require rulemaking.

Acts 2006, ch. 931, § 1.

71-5-150. Reimbursement for TennCare crossover payments.

The bureau of TennCare shall reimburse pharmacies for covered products and services provided for full benefit dual eligibles as TennCare crossover claims at one hundred percent (100%) of the federal medicare program's allowable charge for participating providers.

Acts 2009, ch. 607, § 1.